src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot
@P.Paradigm.NA@ NA_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.NAD@ NAD_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.NI@ NI_Prefix ;
@P.Paradigm.NID@ NID_Prefix ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NAD                                                        !
!         Prefixes                                                             !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NAD_Prefix
@P.Prefix.G@:@P.Prefix.G@g NAD_PrefixBoundary ;
@P.Prefix.GI@:@P.Prefix.GI@gi NAD_PrefixBoundary ;
@P.Prefix.N@:@P.Prefix.N@n NAD_PrefixBoundary ;
@P.Prefix.NI@:@P.Prefix.NI@ni NAD_PrefixBoundary ;
@P.Prefix.O@:@P.Prefix.O@o NAD_PrefixBoundary ;
@P.Prefix.W@:@P.Prefix.W@w NAD_PrefixBoundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NAD                                                        !
!         Morpheme boundary between prefix and stem                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NAD_PrefixBoundary
0:%<%< PrenounRoot ;

LEXICON NounStems
@R.Paradigm.NA@ NA_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.NAD@ NAD_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.NI@ NI_Stems ;
@R.Paradigm.NID@ NID_Stems ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NAD                                                        !
!         Stems                                                                !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary
0:%>%> NAD_Class=NAD_C_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NAD, Class: NAD_C                                          !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NAD_Class=NAD_C_Flags
@R.Prefix.G@ NAD_Class=NAD_C_Flags_Prefix=G ;
@R.Prefix.N@ NAD_Class=NAD_C_Flags_Prefix=N ;
@R.Prefix.W@ NAD_Class=NAD_C_Flags_Prefix=W ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NAD, Class: NAD_C                                          !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=N                                           !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NAD_Class=NAD_C_Flags_Prefix=N
@U.Order.Other@ NAD_Class=NAD_C_Prefix=N_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NAD, Class: NAD_C, Prefix: N, Order: Other                 !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NAD_Stems
baabaanaan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
daan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
daangosh NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
daanis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
daanisens NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
day NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
dayens NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
ded NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
dedenaan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
dedeyikaawin NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
denigom NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
detegom NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
diniigan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
doodem NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
doodikosiw NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
doodoom NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
doodooshim NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
doozhiiwayaan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
doozhim NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
doozhimikwem NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
doozhimis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
doozhimiwayaan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
eshkan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
gibaabaayinaan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
gimishoomisinaan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
gitiziim NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
gizhinis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
gookomisinaan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
gookoonaan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
gos NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
gozis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
gwis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
gwizis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
iiji-zaziikiziimaagan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
iikaan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
iikaanis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
iitaawis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
inded NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
jiichiigom NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
jiimens NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
jiingwan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
jiwaam NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
kidin NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
konaas NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
maam NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
maamaanaan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
mishoomis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
naabem NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
naan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
naga'ay NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
ndaanens NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
ndaanikobidaagan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
ndaanikoobijigan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
ndaanis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
nday NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
ndayens NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
ndoodem NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
ndoozhim NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
ngozis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
ngozisens NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
nigwanis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
niij NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
niijaanis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
niiji-doodem NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
niijigamigishkawaagan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
niijigimaagan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
niikaan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
niitaawis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
nimaamaanaan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
nimaamaawikaawin NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
nina'aanganikwem NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
ninaan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
nindaanike-nimishkoomis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
ningozisens NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
ningwan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
ningwanis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
niniijaanisens NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
niniijaanisikaawin NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
niningwan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
niwiigimaagan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
nizhinis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
noozis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
odashwaan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
odegwa' NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
odeshkan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
odiniigan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
ookomis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
oos NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
oozhis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
oskiigom NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
pigay NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
shimis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
wiidakiwenziiyan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
wiikwan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
wiiw NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
zhaga'ay NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
zigos NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
zigozis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
ziinikiigomaan NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
zinis NAD_Class=NAD_C_Boundary ;
